Washington statutes.
RCW 18.86.900

Effective date—1996 c 179.

This chapter shall take effect on January 1, 1997. This chapter does not apply to an agency relationship entered into before January 1, 1997, unless the principal and agent agree in writing that this chapter will, as of January 1, 1997, apply to such agency relationship.

[ 1996 c 179 s 12.]